test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NI_O_miizhashk_gt-norm.yaml
     +Px2miizhashk+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: gimiizhashkiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2miizhashk+PosObv+Pret+Obv: gimiizhashkiniibanan
     +Px2miizhashk+PosObv+Pret+Pl: gimiizhashkiniibanag
     +Px2miizhashk+PosObv+Pret+Loc: gimiizhashkiniibaning
     +Px2miizhashk+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: gimiizhashkini***idig, idog***an
     +Px2miizhashk+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: gimiizhashkini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2miizhashk+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: gimiizhashkini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3miizhashk+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: omiizhashkinaanibanan
     +Px3miizhashk+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: omiizhashkinaanibanag
     +Px3miizhashk+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: omiizhashkinaanibaning
     +Px3miizhashk+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: omiizhashkinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px3miizhashk+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: omiizhashkinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3miizhashk+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: omiizhashkinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3miizhashk+PosPl+Pret+Obv: omiizhashkiwaaibanan
     +Px3miizhashk+PosPl+Pret+Pl: omiizhashkiwaaibanag
     +Px3miizhashk+PosPl+Pret+Loc: omiizhashkiwaaibaning
     +Px3miizhashk+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: omiizhashkiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px3miizhashk+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: omiizhashkiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3miizhashk+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: omiizhashkiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3miizhashk+PosObv+Pret+Obv: omiizhashkiniibanan
     +Px3miizhashk+PosObv+Pret+Pl: omiizhashkiniibanag
     +Px3miizhashk+PosObv+Pret+Loc: omiizhashkiniibaning
     +Px3miizhashk+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: omiizhashkini***idig, idog***an
     +Px3miizhashk+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: omiizhashkini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3miizhashk+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: omiizhashkini***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefmiizhashk+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: imiizhashkinaanibanan
     +PxIndefmiizhashk+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: imiizhashkinaanibanag
     +PxIndefmiizhashk+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: imiizhashkinaanibaning
     +PxIndefmiizhashk+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: imiizhashkinaan***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefmiizhashk+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: imiizhashkinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefmiizhashk+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: imiizhashkinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefmiizhashk+PosPl+Pret+Obv: imiizhashkiwaaibanan
     +PxIndefmiizhashk+PosPl+Pret+Pl: imiizhashkiwaaibanag
     +PxIndefmiizhashk+PosPl+Pret+Loc: imiizhashkiwaaibaning
     +PxIndefmiizhashk+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: imiizhashkiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefmiizhashk+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: imiizhashkiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefmiizhashk+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: imiizhashkiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefmiizhashk+PosObv+Pret+Obv: imiizhashkiniibanan
     +PxIndefmiizhashk+PosObv+Pret+Pl: imiizhashkiniibanag
     +PxIndefmiizhashk+PosObv+Pret+Loc: imiizhashkiniibaning
     +PxIndefmiizhashk+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: imiizhashkini***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefmiizhashk+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: imiizhashkini***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefmiizhashk+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: imiizhashkini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 5
     miizhashk+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: miizhashkensimishinaan
     miizhashk+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl: miizhashkensimishiwaa
     miizhashk+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv: miizhashkensimishini
     miizhashk+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: miizhashkenhimishinaan
     miizhashk+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl: miizhashkenhimishiwaa
     miizhashk+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv: miizhashkenhimishini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 6
     miizhashk+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret: miizhashkensimishiban
     miizhashk+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl: miizhashkensimish***idig, idog***
     miizhashk+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret: miizhashkenhimishiban
     miizhashk+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl: miizhashkenhimish***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 7
     miizhashk+Dim+Pos+Pej+Obv: miizhashkensimishan
     miizhashk+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pl: miizhashkensimishag
     miizhashk+Dim+Pos+Pej+Loc: miizhashkensimishing
     miizhashk+Con+Pos+Pej+Obv: miizhashkenhimishan
     miizhashk+Con+Pos+Pej+Pl: miizhashkenhimishag
     miizhashk+Con+Pos+Pej+Loc: miizhashkenhimishing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 5, 6
     miizhashk+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret: miizhashkensiminaaniban
     miizhashk+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl: miizhashkensiminaan***idig, idog***
     miizhashk+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pret: miizhashkensimiwaaiban
     miizhashk+Dim+Pos+PosPl+VocPl: miizhashkensimiwaa***idig, idog***
     miizhashk+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pret: miizhashkensiminiiban
     miizhashk+Dim+Pos+PosObv+VocPl: miizhashkensimini***idig, idog***
     miizhashk+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret: miizhashkenhiminaaniban
     miizhashk+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl: miizhashkenhiminaan***idig, idog***
     miizhashk+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pret: miizhashkenhimiwaaiban
     miizhashk+Con+Pos+PosPl+VocPl: miizhashkenhimiwaa***idig, idog***
     miizhashk+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pret: miizhashkenhiminiiban
     miizhashk+Con+Pos+PosObv+VocPl: miizhashkenhimini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 5, 7
     miizhashk+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Obv: miizhashkensiminaanan
     miizhashk+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pl: miizhashkensiminaanag
     miizhashk+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Loc: miizhashkensiminaaning
     miizhashk+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Obv: miizhashkensimiwaaan
     miizhashk+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pl: miizhashkensimiwaaag
     miizhashk+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Loc: miizhashkensimiwaaing
     miizhashk+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Obv: miizhashkensiminian
     miizhashk+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pl: miizhashkensiminiag
     miizhashk+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Loc: miizhashkensiminiing
     miizhashk+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Obv: miizhashkenhiminaanan
     miizhashk+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pl: miizhashkenhiminaanag
     miizhashk+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Loc: miizhashkenhiminaaning
     miizhashk+Con+Pos+PosPl+Obv: miizhashkenhimiwaaan
     miizhashk+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pl: miizhashkenhimiwaaag
     miizhashk+Con+Pos+PosPl+Loc: miizhashkenhimiwaaing
     miizhashk+Con+Pos+PosObv+Obv: miizhashkenhiminian
     miizhashk+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pl: miizhashkenhiminiag
     miizhashk+Con+Pos+PosObv+Loc: miizhashkenhiminiing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 6, 7
     miizhashk+Dim+Pos+Pret+Obv: miizhashkensimibanan
     miizhashk+Dim+Pos+Pret+Pl: miizhashkensimibanag
     miizhashk+Dim+Pos+Pret+Loc: miizhashkensimibaning
     miizhashk+Dim+Pos+VocPl+Obv: miizhashkensim***idig, idog***an
     miizhashk+Dim+Pos+VocPl+Pl: miizhashkensim***idig, idog***ag
     miizhashk+Dim+Pos+VocPl+Loc: miizhashkensim***idig, idog***ing
     miizhashk+Con+Pos+Pret+Obv: miizhashkenhimibanan
     miizhashk+Con+Pos+Pret+Pl: miizhashkenhimibanag
     miizhashk+Con+Pos+Pret+Loc: miizhashkenhimibaning
     miizhashk+Con+Pos+VocPl+Obv: miizhashkenhim***idig, idog***an
     miizhashk+Con+Pos+VocPl+Pl: miizhashkenhim***idig, idog***ag
     miizhashk+Con+Pos+VocPl+Loc: miizhashkenhim***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 5, 6
     miizhashk+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: miizhashkensishinaaniban
     miizhashk+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: miizhashkensishinaan***idig, idog***
     miizhashk+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pret: miizhashkensishiwaaiban
     miizhashk+Dim+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: miizhashkensishiwaa***idig, idog***
     miizhashk+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Pret: miizhashkensishiniiban
     miizhashk+Dim+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: miizhashkensishini***idig, idog***
     miizhashk+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: miizhashkenhishinaaniban
     miizhashk+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: miizhashkenhishinaan***idig, idog***
     miizhashk+Con+Pej+PosPl+Pret: miizhashkenhishiwaaiban
     miizhashk+Con+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: miizhashkenhishiwaa***idig, idog***
     miizhashk+Con+Pej+PosObv+Pret: miizhashkenhishiniiban
     miizhashk+Con+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: miizhashkenhishini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 5, 7
     miizhashk+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: miizhashkensishinaanan
     miizhashk+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: miizhashkensishinaanag
     miizhashk+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: miizhashkensishinaaning
     miizhashk+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Obv: miizhashkensishiwaaan
     miizhashk+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pl: miizhashkensishiwaaag
     miizhashk+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Loc: miizhashkensishiwaaing
     miizhashk+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Obv: miizhashkensishinian
     miizhashk+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Pl: miizhashkensishiniag
     miizhashk+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Loc: miizhashkensishiniing
     miizhashk+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: miizhashkenhishinaanan
     miizhashk+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: miizhashkenhishinaanag
     miizhashk+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: miizhashkenhishinaaning
     miizhashk+Con+Pej+PosPl+Obv: miizhashkenhishiwaaan
     miizhashk+Con+Pej+PosPl+Pl: miizhashkenhishiwaaag
     miizhashk+Con+Pej+PosPl+Loc: miizhashkenhishiwaaing
     miizhashk+Con+Pej+PosObv+Obv: miizhashkenhishinian
     miizhashk+Con+Pej+PosObv+Pl: miizhashkenhishiniag
     miizhashk+Con+Pej+PosObv+Loc: miizhashkenhishiniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 6, 7
     miizhashk+Dim+Pej+Pret+Obv: miizhashkensishibanan
     miizhashk+Dim+Pej+Pret+Pl: miizhashkensishibanag
     miizhashk+Dim+Pej+Pret+Loc: miizhashkensishibaning
     miizhashk+Dim+Pej+VocPl+Obv: miizhashkensish***idig, idog***an
     miizhashk+Dim+Pej+VocPl+Pl: miizhashkensish***idig, idog***ag
     miizhashk+Dim+Pej+VocPl+Loc: miizhashkensish***idig, idog***ing
     miizhashk+Con+Pej+Pret+Obv: miizhashkenhishibanan
     miizhashk+Con+Pej+Pret+Pl: miizhashkenhishibanag
     miizhashk+Con+Pej+Pret+Loc: miizhashkenhishibaning
     miizhashk+Con+Pej+VocPl+Obv: miizhashkenhish***idig, idog***an
     miizhashk+Con+Pej+VocPl+Pl: miizhashkenhish***idig, idog***ag
     miizhashk+Con+Pej+VocPl+Loc: miizhashkenhish***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 5, 6, 7
     miizhashk+Dim+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: miizhashkensinaanibanan
     miizhashk+Dim+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: miizhashkensinaanibanag
     miizhashk+Dim+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: miizhashkensinaanibaning
     miizhashk+Dim+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: miizhashkensinaan***idig, idog***an
     miizhashk+Dim+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: miizhashkensinaan***idig, idog***ag
     miizhashk+Dim+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: miizhashkensinaan***idig, idog***ing
     miizhashk+Dim+PosPl+Pret+Obv: miizhashkensiwaaibanan
     miizhashk+Dim+PosPl+Pret+Pl: miizhashkensiwaaibanag
     miizhashk+Dim+PosPl+Pret+Loc: miizhashkensiwaaibaning
     miizhashk+Dim+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: miizhashkensiwaa***idig, idog***an
     miizhashk+Dim+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: miizhashkensiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     miizhashk+Dim+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: miizhashkensiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     miizhashk+Dim+PosObv+Pret+Obv: miizhashkensiniibanan
     miizhashk+Dim+PosObv+Pret+Pl: miizhashkensiniibanag
     miizhashk+Dim+PosObv+Pret+Loc: miizhashkensiniibaning
     miizhashk+Dim+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: miizhashkensini***idig, idog***an
     miizhashk+Dim+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: miizhashkensini***idig, idog***ag
     miizhashk+Dim+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: miizhashkensini***idig, idog***ing
     miizhashk+Con+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: miizhashkenhinaanibanan
     miizhashk+Con+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: miizhashkenhinaanibanag
     miizhashk+Con+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: miizhashkenhinaanibaning
     miizhashk+Con+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: miizhashkenhinaan***idig, idog***an
     miizhashk+Con+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: miizhashkenhinaan***idig, idog***ag
     miizhashk+Con+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: miizhashkenhinaan***idig, idog***ing
     miizhashk+Con+PosPl+Pret+Obv: miizhashkenhiwaaibanan
     miizhashk+Con+PosPl+Pret+Pl: miizhashkenhiwaaibanag
     miizhashk+Con+PosPl+Pret+Loc: miizhashkenhiwaaibaning
     miizhashk+Con+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: miizhashkenhiwaa***idig, idog***an
     miizhashk+Con+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: miizhashkenhiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     miizhashk+Con+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: miizhashkenhiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     miizhashk+Con+PosObv+Pret+Obv: miizhashkenhiniibanan
     miizhashk+Con+PosObv+Pret+Pl: miizhashkenhiniibanag
     miizhashk+Con+PosObv+Pret+Loc: miizhashkenhiniibaning
     miizhashk+Con+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: miizhashkenhini***idig, idog***an
     miizhashk+Con+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: miizhashkenhini***idig, idog***ag
     miizhashk+Con+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: miizhashkenhini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4, 5, 6
     miizhashk+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: miizhashkimishinaaniban
     miizhashk+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: miizhashkimishinaan***idig, idog***
     miizhashk+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: miizhashkimishiwaaiban
     miizhashk+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: miizhashkimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     miizhashk+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: miizhashkimishiniiban
